Utah statutes.
31A-19a-215.   False or misleading information.

A person or organization may not:

(1)  willfully withhold from the commissioner, any rate service organization, or any insurer information that will affect the rates or premiums chargeable under this chapter; or

(2)  knowingly give false or misleading information to the commissioner, any rate service organization, or any insurer.



Enacted by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

